Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.072

Pathological gambling behavior—Warning.

An entity licensed under RCW 9.46.070(1) which conducts or allows its premises to be used for conducting bingo on more than three occasions per week shall include the following statement in any advertising or promotion of gambling activity conducted by the licensee:

"CAUTION: Participation in gambling activity may result in pathological gambling behavior causing emotional and financial harm. For help, call 1-800-547-6133."

For purposes of this section, "advertising" includes print media, point-of-sale advertising, electronic media, billboards, and radio advertising.

[ 2002 c 369 s 3.]